Indiana, session 2026, HB1340.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-37-4-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The board is exempt under IC 6-2.5-5-16 from
the state gross retail tax for transactions involving tangible personal
property, public utility commodities, and public utility service.
SECTION 2. IC 6-2.5-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2020,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), or (c),
"unitary transaction" includes all items of personal property and
services which are furnished under a single order or agreement and for
which a total combined charge or price is calculated.
(b) "Unitary transaction" does not include a transaction that meets
one (1) of the exceptions in section 11.5(d) of this chapter.
(c) "Unitary transaction" as it applies to the furnishing of public
utility commodities or services means the public utility commodities
and services which are invoiced in a single bill or statement for
payment by the consumer.
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


SECTION 3. IC 6-2.5-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), "gross
retail income" means the total amount of consideration, including cash,
credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property is
sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or
otherwise, without any deduction for:
(1) the seller's cost of the property sold;
(2) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest,
losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed
on the seller, and any other expense of the seller;
(3) charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete
the sale, other than delivery and installation charges;
(4) delivery charges; or
(5) consideration received by the seller from a third party if:
(A) the seller actually receives consideration from a party
other than the purchaser and the consideration is directly
related to a price reduction or discount on the sale;
(B) the seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or
discount through to the purchaser;
(C) the amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is
fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of
the item to the purchaser; and
(D) the price reduction or discount is identified as a third party
price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the
purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation
presented by the purchaser.
For purposes of subdivision (4), delivery charges are charges by the
seller for preparation and delivery of the property to a location
designated by the purchaser of property, including but not limited to
transportation, shipping, postage charges that are not separately stated
on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document, handling, crating, and
packing. Delivery charges do not include postage charges that are
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document.
(b) "Gross retail income" does not include that part of the gross
receipts attributable to:
(1) the value of any tangible personal property received in a like
kind exchange in the retail transaction, if the value of the property
given in exchange is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale,
or similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) the receipts received in a retail transaction which constitute
interest, finance charges, or insurance premiums on either a
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


promissory note or an installment sales contract;
(3) discounts, including cash, terms, or coupons that are not
reimbursed by a third party that are allowed by a seller and taken
by a purchaser on a sale;
(4) interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended
on the sale of personal property if the amount is separately stated
on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the
purchaser;
(5) any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser, including an excise tax imposed under
IC 6-6-15;
(6) installation charges that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
(7) telecommunications nonrecurring charges;
(8) postage charges that are separately stated on the invoice, bill
of sale, or similar document; or
(9) charges for serving or delivering food and food ingredients
furnished, prepared, or served for consumption at a location, or on
equipment, provided by the retail merchant, to the extent that the
charges for the serving or delivery are stated separately from the
price of the food and food ingredients when the purchaser pays
the charges.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b)(5):
(1) in the case of retail sales of special fuel (as defined in
IC 6-6-2.5-22) or kerosene (as defined in IC 16-44-2-2), the gross
retail income is the total sales price of the special fuel or kerosene
minus the part of that price attributable to tax imposed under
IC 6-6-2.5 (in the case of special fuel) or Section 4041 or Section
4081 of the Internal Revenue Code (in the case of either special
fuel or kerosene);
(2) in the case of retail sales of cigarettes (as defined in
IC 6-7-1-2), the gross retail income is the total sales price of the
cigarettes including the tax imposed under IC 6-7-1; and
(3) in the case of retail sales of consumable material (as defined
in IC 6-7-4-2), vapor products (as defined in IC 6-7-4-8), and
closed system cartridges (as defined in IC 6-7-2-0.5) under the
closed system cartridge tax, the gross retail income received from
selling at retail is the total sales price of the consumable material
(as defined in IC 6-7-4-2), vapor products (as defined in
IC 6-7-4-8), and closed system cartridges (as defined in
IC 6-7-2-0.5) including the tax imposed under IC 6-7-4 and
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


IC 6-7-2-7.5.
(d) Gross retail income is only taxable under this article to the
extent that the income represents:
(1) the price of the property transferred, without the rendition of
any services; and
(2) except as provided in subsection (b), any bona fide charges
which are made for preparation, fabrication, alteration,
modification, finishing, completion, delivery, or other service
performed in respect to the property transferred before its transfer
and which are separately stated on the transferor's records. For
purposes of this subdivision, a transfer is considered to have
occurred after the delivery of the property to the purchaser.
(e) A public utility's or a power subsidiary's gross retail income
includes all gross retail income received by the public utility or power
subsidiary, including any minimum charge, flat charge, membership
fee, or any other form of charge or billing.
SECTION 4. IC 6-2.5-4-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 5. A power subsidiary or a person engaged as a public
utility is a retail merchant making a retail transaction when the
subsidiary or person furnishes or sells electrical energy, natural or
artificial gas, water, steam, or steam heating service to a person for
commercial or domestic consumption.
SECTION 5. IC 6-2.5-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.84-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A person is a retail merchant making a retail
transaction when the person:
(1) furnishes or sells an intrastate telecommunication service; and
(2) receives gross retail income from billings or statements
rendered to customers.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person is not a retail merchant
making a retail transaction when:
(1) the person furnishes or sells telecommunication services to
another person described in this section or in section 5 of this
chapter; a power subsidiary or a person engaged as a public
utility that furnishes or sells electrical energy, natural or
artificial gas, water, steam, or steam heating service to a
person for commercial or domestic consumption;
(2) the person furnishes telecommunications services to another
person who is providing prepaid calling services or prepaid
wireless calling services in a retail transaction to customers who
access the services described in section 13 of this chapter;
(3) the person furnishes intrastate mobile telecommunications
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


service (as defined in IC 6-8.1-15-7) to a customer with a place of
primary use that is not located in Indiana (as determined under
IC 6-8.1-15); or
(4) the person furnishes or sells value added nonvoice data
services in a retail transaction to a customer.
(c) Subject to IC 6-2.5-12 and IC 6-8.1-15, and notwithstanding
subsections (a) and (b), if charges for telecommunication services,
ancillary services, Internet access, audio services, or video services that
are not taxable under this article are aggregated with and not separately
stated from charges subject to taxation under this article, the charges
for nontaxable telecommunication services, ancillary services, Internet
access, audio services, or video services are subject to taxation unless
the service provider can reasonably identify the charges not subject to
the tax from the service provider's books and records kept in the regular
course of business.
SECTION 6. IC 6-2.5-5-5.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2024,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.1. (a) As used in this section, "tangible personal
property" includes electricity, gas, water, and steam.
(b) Transactions involving tangible personal property are exempt
from the state gross retail tax if the person acquiring the property
acquires it for direct consumption as a material to be consumed in the
direct production of other tangible personal property in the person's
business of manufacturing, mining, production, processing, repairing,
recycling (as defined in section 45.8 of this chapter), refining, oil
extraction, mineral extraction, irrigation, agriculture, floriculture,
arboriculture, or horticulture. This exemption includes transactions
involving acquisitions of tangible personal property used in
commercial printing.
(c) Transactions involving tangible personal property are exempt
from the state gross retail tax if the person acquiring that property:
(1) acquires it for the person's direct consumption as a material to
be consumed in an industrial processing service; and
(2) is an industrial processor.
(d) Transactions involving tangible personal property are exempt
from the state gross retail tax if the person acquiring the property:
(1) acquires it for the person's direct consumption as a material to
be consumed in:
(A) the direct application of fertilizers, pesticides, fungicides,
seeds, and other tangible personal property; or
(B) the direct extraction, harvesting, or processing of
agricultural commodities;
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


for consideration; and
(2) is occupationally engaged in providing the services described
in subdivision (1) on property that is:
(A) owned or rented by another person occupationally engaged
in agricultural production; and
(B) used for agricultural production.
(e) Transactions involving electricity, gas, water, and steam
delivered through a single meter provided by a public utility are exempt
if the electrical energy, natural or artificial gas, water, steam, or steam
heat is consumed for a purpose exempted pursuant to this section and
the electricity, gas, water, or steam is predominately used by the
purchaser for one (1) or more of the purposes exempted by this section.
(f) (e) A retail merchant that receives seventy-five percent (75%) or
more of its receipts from the sale of prepared food as defined in section
20(c)(4), 20(c)(5), and 20(c)(6) of this chapter, including bakery items,
may elect to claim an exemption equal to fifty percent (50%) of the
gross retail tax imposed on transactions involving electricity purchased
by the retail merchant that is derived through a single meter. The
election must be submitted on forms provided by the department. Upon
acceptance of the election, the department shall issue a partial
exemption certificate to the utility and any third party suppliers, if
applicable. The election may also be submitted with a claim for refund.
The election is irrevocable for any period for which the partial
exemption has already been claimed. The election can be withdrawn on
a prospective basis.
SECTION 7. IC 6-2.5-5-8.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. Transactions are exempt from the state gross
retail tax when
(1) a power subsidiary or person provides, installs, constructs,
services, or removes tangible personal property which is used in
connection with the furnishing of the services or commodities
listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5; electrical energy, natural or artificial
gas, water, steam, or steam heating service.
(2) a power subsidiary or person sells the services or commodities
listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 to another public utility or power subsidiary
or a person described in IC 6-2.5-4-6; or
(3) a power subsidiary or person sells the services or commodities
listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 and all of the following conditions are
satisfied:
(A) The services or commodities are sold to a business that:
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


(i) relocates all or part of its operations to a facility; or
(ii) expands all or part of its operations in a facility;
located in a military base (as defined in IC 36-7-30-1(c)), a
military base reuse area established under IC 36-7-14.5-12.5
that is or formerly was a military base (as defined in
IC 36-7-30-1(c)), or a qualified military base enhancement
area established under IC 36-7-34.
(B) The business uses the services or commodities in the
facility described in clause (A) not later than five (5) years
after the operations that relocated to the facility, or expanded
in the facility, commence.
(C) The sales of the services or commodities are separately
metered for use by the relocated or expanded operations.
(D) In the case of a business that uses the services or
commodities in a qualified military base enhancement area
established under IC 36-7-34-4(1), the business must satisfy at
least one (1) of the following criteria:
(i) The business is a participant in the technology transfer
program conducted by the qualified military base (as defined
in IC 36-7-34-3).
(ii) The business is a United States Department of Defense
contractor.
(iii) The business and the qualified military base have a
mutually beneficial relationship evidenced by a
memorandum of understanding between the business and
the United States Department of Defense.
(E) In the case of a business that uses the services and
commodities in a qualified military base enhancement area
established under IC 36-7-34-4(2), the business must satisfy at
least one (1) of the following criteria:
(i) The business is a participant in the technology transfer
program conducted by the qualified military base (as defined
in IC 36-7-34-3).
(ii) The business and the qualified miliary base have a
mutually beneficial relationship evidenced by a
memorandum of understanding between the business and
the qualified military base (as defined in IC 36-7-34-3).
However, this subdivision does not apply to a business that
substantially reduces or ceases its operations at another location
in Indiana in order to relocate its operations in an area described
in this subdivision, unless the department determines that the
business had existing operations in the area described in this
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


subdivision and that the operations relocated to the area are an
expansion of the business's operations in the area.
SECTION 8. IC 6-2.5-5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.137-2022,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. Transactions involving tangible personal
property are exempt from the state gross retail tax, if:
(1) the property is classified as production plant or power
production expenses, according to the uniform system of accounts
which was adopted and prescribed for the utility by the Indiana
utility regulatory commission; and
(2) the person acquiring the property is:
(A) a public utility that furnishes or sells electrical energy,
steam, or steam heat; in a retail transaction described in
IC 6-2.5-4-5; or
(B) a power subsidiary (as defined in IC 6-2.5-1-22.5) that
furnishes or sells electrical energy, steam, or steam heat to a
public utility described in clause (A).
SECTION 9. IC 6-2.5-5-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. Transactions
involving tangible personal property are exempt from the state gross
retail tax, if:
(1) the property is classified as production plant, storage plant,
production expenses, or underground storage expenses according
to the uniform system of accounts, which was adopted and
prescribed for the utility by the Indiana utility regulatory
commission; and
(2) the person acquiring the property is a public utility that
furnishes or sells natural or artificial gas. in a retail transaction
described in IC 6-2.5-4-5.
SECTION 10. IC 6-2.5-5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.88-2007,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. Transactions involving tangible personal
property are exempt from the state gross retail tax if:
(1) the property is classified as source of supply plant and
expenses, the pumping plant and expenses, or water treatment
plant and expenses according to the uniform system of accounts
which was adopted and prescribed for the utility by the Indiana
utility regulatory commission; and
(2) the person acquiring the property is a public utility that
furnishes or sells water. in a retail transaction described in
IC 6-2.5-4-5.
SECTION 11. IC 6-2.5-5-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.293-2013(ts),
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. Transactions involving tangible personal
property and accommodations public utility commodities, and public
utility service are exempt from the state gross retail tax, if the person
acquiring the property or accommodations: commodities, or service:
(1) is the state of Indiana, an agency or instrumentality of the
state, a political subdivision of the state, or an agency or
instrumentality of a political subdivision of the state, including a
county solid waste management district or a joint solid waste
management district established under IC 13-21 or IC 13-9.5-2
(before its repeal); and
(2) predominantly uses the property or accommodations
commodities, or service to perform its governmental functions.
SECTION 12. IC 6-2.5-5-45.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.242-2015,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 45.8. (a) For purposes of this section IC 6-2.5-4-5,
and section 30 of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Recycling" means the processing of recycling materials and
other tangible personal property into a product for sale if the
product is predominantly composed of recycling materials. The
term does not include the following:
(A) The demolition of improvements to real estate.
(B) The processing of tangible personal property primarily for
disposal in a licensed solid waste disposal facility rather than
for sale.
(C) The collection of recycling materials.
(2) "Recycling materials" means tangible personal property,
including metal, paper, glass, plastic, textile, or rubber, that:
(A) is considered "scrap" by industry standards or has no more
than scrap value;
(B) is a byproduct of another person's manufacturing or
production process;
(C) was previously manufactured or incorporated into a
product;
(D) would otherwise reasonably be expected to be destined for
disposal in a licensed solid waste disposal facility; or
(E) has been removed or diverted from the solid waste stream
for sale, use, or reuse as raw materials, regardless of whether
or not the materials require subsequent processing or
separation from each other.
(3) "Processing of recycling materials" means:
(A) receiving recycling materials and other tangible personal
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


property; and
(B) creating a product for sale by changing the original form,
use, or composition of the property (whether manually,
mechanically, chemically, or otherwise) through weighing,
sorting, grading, separating, shredding, crushing, compacting,
breaking, cutting, baling, shearing, torching, wire-stripping, or
other means.
(4) "Occupationally engaged in the business of recycling" means
to engage in recycling with the intention of doing so at a profit.
(5) "Recycling cart" means a manually propelled container with
a capacity of not more than one hundred (100) gallons of
recycling materials.
(b) Transactions involving recycling materials and other tangible
personal property are exempt from the state gross retail tax if:
(1) the person acquiring that property acquires it for the person's
direct use in the processing of recycling materials; and
(2) the person acquiring that property is occupationally engaged
in the business of recycling.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(1)(C), transactions involving a
recycling cart are exempt from the state gross retail tax if the person
acquiring the recycling cart is occupationally engaged in the business
of recycling.
SECTION 13. IC 6-2.5-5-59 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 59. The sale or furnishing of any of the following
services or commodities by a power subsidiary or a person engaged
as a public utility to a person for commercial or domestic
consumption is exempt from the state gross retail tax:
(1) Electrical energy.
(2) Natural or artificial gas.
(3) Water.
(4) Steam.
(5) Steam heating service.
SECTION 14. IC 6-2.5-6-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2017,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) In order to compensate retail merchants
and those required to remit gasoline use tax for collecting and timely
remitting the state gross retail tax, the state use tax, and the gasoline
use tax, every retail merchant or person required to remit the gasoline
use tax, except as provided in subsection (c), is entitled to deduct and
retain from the amount of those taxes otherwise required to be remitted
under IC 6-2.5-3.5 or under this chapter, if timely remitted, a retail
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


merchant's collection allowance.
(b) The allowance equals a percentage of the retail merchant's state
gross retail and use tax or the person's gasoline use tax liability accrued
during a calendar year, specified as follows:
(1) Seventy-three hundredths percent (0.73%), if the retail
merchant's state gross retail and use tax or gasoline use tax
liability accrued during the state fiscal year ending on June 30 of
the immediately preceding calendar year did not exceed sixty
thousand dollars ($60,000).
(2) Fifty-three hundredths percent (0.53%), if the retail merchant's
state gross retail and use tax or gasoline use tax liability accrued
during the state fiscal year ending on June 30 of the immediately
preceding calendar year:
(A) was greater than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000); and
(B) did not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000).
(3) Twenty-six hundredths percent (0.26%), if the retail
merchant's state gross retail and use tax liability or the person's
gasoline use tax accrued during the state fiscal year ending on
June 30 of the immediately preceding calendar year was greater
than six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000).
(c) A retail merchant described in IC 6-2.5-4-5 or IC 6-2.5-4-6 is not
entitled to the allowance provided by this section. A retail merchant is
not entitled to the allowance provided by this section with respect to
gasoline use taxes imposed by IC 6-2.5-3.5.
SECTION 15. IC 6-2.5-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2024,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A retail merchant may not make a retail
transaction in Indiana, unless the retail merchant has applied for a
registered retail merchant's certificate.
(b) A retail merchant may obtain a registered retail merchant's
certificate by filing an application with the department and paying a
registration fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each place of business
listed on the application. The retail merchant shall also provide such
security for payment of the tax as the department may require under
IC 6-2.5-6-12.
(c) The retail merchant shall list on the application the location
(including the township) of each place of business where the retail
merchant makes retail transactions. However, if the retail merchant
does not have a fixed place of business, the retail merchant shall list the
retail merchant's residence as the retail merchant's place of business. In
addition, a public utility may list only its principal Indiana office as its
place of business for sales of public utility commodities or service, but
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


the utility must also list on the application the places of business where
it makes retail transactions other than sales of public utility
commodities or service.
(d) Upon receiving a proper application, the correct fee, and the
security for payment, if required, the department shall issue to the retail
merchant a separate registered retail merchant's certificate for each
place of business listed on the application. Each certificate shall bear
a serial number and the location of the place of business for which it is
issued.
(e) The department may deny an application for a registered retail
merchant's certificate if the applicant's business is owned, operated,
managed, or otherwise controlled by a person who the department has
determined:
(1) failed to:
(A) file all tax returns or information reports with the
department for listed taxes; or
(B) pay all taxes, penalties, and interest to the department for
listed taxes; and
(2) the business of the person who has failed to file all tax returns
or information reports under subdivision (1)(A) or who has failed
to pay all taxes, penalties, and interest under subdivision (1)(B)
is substantially similar to the business of the applicant.
(f) If a retail merchant intends to make retail transactions during a
calendar year at a new Indiana place of business, the retail merchant
must file a supplemental application and pay the fee for that place of
business.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (i), a registered retail
merchant's certificate is valid for two (2) years after the date the
registered retail merchant's certificate is originally issued or renewed.
If the retail merchant has filed all returns and remitted all listed taxes
that the retail merchant is currently obligated to file or remit, the
department shall renew the registered retail merchant's certificate
within thirty (30) days after the expiration date, at no cost to the retail
merchant. Before issuing or renewing the registered retail merchant
certification, the department may require the following to be provided:
(1) The names and addresses of the retail merchant's principal
employees, agents, or representatives.
(2) The location of all of the retail merchant's places of business
in Indiana, including offices and distribution houses.
(3) Any other information that the department requests.
(h) The department may not renew a registered retail merchant
certificate of a retail merchant who has not filed all returns and
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


remitted all listed taxes that the retail merchant is currently obligated
to file or remit. The department, at least sixty (60) days before the date
on which a retail merchant's registered retail merchant's certificate
expires, shall notify a retail merchant who has not filed all returns and
remitted all listed taxes that the retail merchant is currently obligated
to file or remit that the department will not renew the retail merchant's
registered retail merchant's certificate.
(i) If:
(1) a retail merchant has been notified by the department that the
retail merchant has not filed all returns and remitted all listed
taxes that the retail merchant is currently obligated to file or remit
in accordance with subsection (h); and
(2) the retail merchant files all returns and pays the outstanding
liability before the expiration of the retail merchant's registered
retail merchant's certificate;
the department shall renew the retail merchant's registered retail
merchant's certificate for one (1) year.
(j) The department may permit an out-of-state retail merchant to
collect the gross retail tax in instances where the retail merchant has
not met the threshold in IC 6-2.5-2-1(d). However, before the
out-of-state retail merchant may collect the tax, the out-of-state retail
merchant must obtain a registered retail merchant's certificate in the
manner provided by this section. Upon receiving the certificate, the
out-of-state retail merchant becomes subject to the same conditions and
duties as an Indiana retail merchant and must then collect the gross
retail tax due on all retail transactions that the out-of-state retail
merchant knows are sourced to Indiana pursuant to IC 6-2.5-13-1.
(k) Except as provided in subsection (l), the department shall submit
to the township assessor, or the county assessor if there is no township
assessor for the township, before January 15 of each year:
(1) the name of each retail merchant that has newly obtained a
registered retail merchant's certificate during the preceding year
for a place of business located in the township or county;
(2) the address of each place of business of the taxpayer in the
township or county described in subdivision (1);
(3) the name of each retail merchant that:
(A) held a registered retail merchant's certificate at any time
during the preceding year for a place of business located in the
township or county; and
(B) had ceased to hold the registered retail merchant's
certificate at the end of the preceding year for the place of
business; and
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


(4) the address of each place of business described in subdivision
(3).
(l) If the duties of the township assessor have been transferred to the
county assessor as described in IC 6-1.1-1-24, the department shall
submit the information listed in subsection (k) to the county assessor.
SECTION 16. IC 6-2.5-8-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 97, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A person, authorized under subsection (b),
who makes a purchase in a transaction which is exempt from the state
gross retail and use taxes, may issue an exemption certificate to the
seller instead of paying the tax. Except as provided in subsection (c),
the person shall issue the certificate on forms and in the manner
prescribed by the department on the department's website. A seller
accepting a proper exemption certificate under this section has no duty
to collect or remit the state gross retail or use tax on that purchase.
(b) The following are the only persons authorized to issue
exemption certificates:
(1) Retail merchants, wholesalers, and manufacturers, who are
registered with the department under this chapter.
(2) Persons who are exempt from the state gross retail tax under
IC 6-2.5-4-5 and who receive an exemption certificate from the
department.
(3) (2) Other persons who are exempt from the state gross retail
tax with respect to any part of their purchases.
(c) Organizations that are exempt from the state gross retail tax
under IC 6-2.5-5-21, IC 6-2.5-5-25, or IC 6-2.5-5-26 and that are
registered with the department pursuant to IC 6-2.5-5-25(c) shall be
electronically issued an exemption certificate by the department.
(d) The department may also allow a person to issue a blanket
exemption certificate to cover exempt purchases over a stated period
of time. The department may impose conditions on the use of the
blanket exemption certificate and restrictions on the kind or category
of purchases that are exempt.
(e) A seller that accepts an incomplete exemption certificate under
subsection (a) is not relieved of the duty to collect gross retail or use
tax on the sale unless the seller obtains:
(1) a fully completed exemption certificate; or
(2) the relevant data to complete the exemption certificate;
within ninety (90) days after the sale.
(f) If a seller has accepted an incomplete exemption certificate
under subsection (a) and the department requests that the seller
substantiate the exemption, within one hundred twenty (120) days after
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


the department makes the request the seller shall:
(1) obtain a fully completed exemption certificate; or
(2) prove by other means that the transaction was not subject to
state gross retail or use tax.
(g) A power subsidiary (as defined in IC 6-2.5-1-22.5) or a person
selling the services or commodities listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 who accepts
an exemption certificate issued by the department to a person who is
exempt from the state gross retail tax under IC 6-2.5-4-5 is relieved
from the duty to collect state gross retail or use tax on the sale of the
services or commodities listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 until notified by the
department that the exemption certificate has expired or has been
revoked. If the department notifies a power subsidiary or a person
selling the services or commodities listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 that a person's
exemption certificate has expired or has been revoked, the power
subsidiary or person selling the services or commodities listed in
IC 6-2.5-4-5 shall begin collecting state gross retail tax on the sale of
the services or commodities listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 to the person whose
exemption certificate has expired or been revoked not later than thirty
(30) days after the date of the department's notice. An exemption
certificate issued by the department to a person who is exempt from the
state gross retail tax under IC 6-2.5-4-5 remains valid for that person
regardless of any subsequent one (1) for one (1) meter number changes
with respect to that person that are required, made, or initiated by a
power subsidiary or a person selling the services or commodities listed
in IC 6-2.5-4-5, unless the department revokes the exemption
certificate. Within thirty (30) days after the final day of each calendar
year quarter, a power subsidiary or a person selling the services or
commodities listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 shall report to the department any
meter number changes made during the immediately preceding
calendar year quarter and distinguish between the one (1) for one (1)
meter changes and the one (1) for multiple meter changes made during
the calendar year quarter. A power subsidiary or a person selling the
services or commodities listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 shall maintain records
sufficient to document each one (1) to one (1) meter change. A person
may request the department to reissue an exemption certificate with a
new meter number in the event of a one (1) to one (1) meter change.
Except for a person to whom a blanket utility exemption applies, any
meter number changes not involving a one (1) to one (1) relationship
will no longer be exempt and will require the person to submit a new
utility exemption application for the new meters. Until an application
for a new meter is approved, the new meter is subject to the state gross
retail tax and the power subsidiary or the person selling the services or
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


commodities listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 is required to collect the state gross
retail tax from the date of the meter change.
SECTION 17. IC 6-2.5-15-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) A qualified data center user or a quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network operator that holds an interest in a qualified data center or an
interest in a quantum computing research, advanced computing, and
defense infrastructure network may apply to the corporation for a
specific transaction award certificate to make purchases other than the
purchase of utilities described in IC 6-2.5-4-5, that are exempt under
this chapter. The request must be on a form prescribed by the
corporation.
(b) The corporation has exclusive authority over issues related to
issuing a specific transaction award certificate.
(c) If the corporation issues a specific transaction award certificate
under this chapter, the certificate must state that the facility is a
qualified data center or a quantum computing research, advanced
computing, and defense infrastructure network, as applicable.
(d) A specific transaction award certificate issued by the corporation
shall expire not later than:
(1) twenty-five (25) years after the date of issuance;
(2) in the case of a qualified data center user, fifty (50) years after
the date of issuance if the qualified investment is seven hundred
fifty million dollars ($750,000,000) or greater; or
(3) in the case of a quantum computing research, advanced
computing, and defense infrastructure network operator, fifty (50)
years after the date of issuance if the qualified investment is fifty
million dollars ($50,000,000) or greater within three (3) years of
the issuance of the transaction award certificate.
SECTION 18. IC 6-2.5-15-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. A qualified data center user or a quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network operator is not entitled to the exemption provided by section
16 of this chapter unless the qualified data center user or the quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network operator provides the seller with an exemption certificate on
a form prescribed by the department and a copy of the specific
transaction award certificate issued by the corporation. In the case of
utilities described in IC 6-2.5-4-5, the qualified data center user may
issue an exemption certificate on a form prescribed by the department
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


and a copy of the specific transaction award certificate issued by the
corporation to cover all utility purchases from that seller. However, for
the corporation to issue a specific transaction award certificate for
utilities described in IC 6-2.5-4-5, the qualified data center user must
agree to report and remit use tax under this article to the department on
the part of the utility purchases used for administration of the facility.
SECTION 19. IC 6-8.1-7-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.126-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This subsection does not apply to the
disclosure of information concerning a conviction on a tax evasion
charge. Unless in accordance with a judicial order or as otherwise
provided in this chapter, the department, its employees, former
employees, counsel, agents, or any other person may not divulge the
amount of tax paid by any taxpayer, terms of a settlement agreement
executed between a taxpayer and the department, investigation records,
investigation reports, or any other information disclosed by the reports
filed under the provisions of the law relating to any of the listed taxes,
including required information derived from a federal return, except to
any of the following when it is agreed that the information is to be
confidential and to be used solely for official purposes:
(1) Members and employees of the department.
(2) The governor.
(3) A member of the general assembly or an employee of the
house of representatives or the senate when acting on behalf of a
taxpayer located in the member's legislative district who has
provided sufficient information to the member or employee for
the department to determine that the member or employee is
acting on behalf of the taxpayer.
(4) An employee of the legislative services agency to carry out the
responsibilities of the legislative services agency under
IC 2-5-1.1-7 or another law.
(5) The attorney general or any other legal representative of the
state in any action in respect to the amount of tax due under the
provisions of the law relating to any of the listed taxes.
(6) Any authorized officers of the United States.
(b) The information described in subsection (a) may be revealed
upon the receipt of a certified request of any designated officer of the
state tax department of any other state, district, territory, or possession
of the United States when:
(1) the state, district, territory, or possession permits the exchange
of like information with the taxing officials of the state; and
(2) it is agreed that the information is to be confidential and to be
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


used solely for tax collection purposes.
(c) The information described in subsection (a) relating to a person
on public welfare or a person who has made application for public
welfare may be revealed to the office of the secretary of family and
social services for purposes of IC 12-15-1-24, the director of the
division of family resources, and to any director of a county office of
the division of family resources located in Indiana, upon receipt of a
written request from either director for the information. The
information shall be treated as confidential by the office and the
directors. In addition, the information described in subsection (a)
relating to a person who has been designated as an absent parent by the
state Title IV-D agency shall be made available to the state Title IV-D
agency upon request. The information shall be subject to the
information safeguarding provisions of the state and federal Title IV-D
programs.
(d) The name, address, Social Security number, and place of
employment relating to any individual who is delinquent in paying
educational loans owed to a postsecondary educational institution may
be revealed to that institution if it provides proof to the department that
the individual is delinquent in paying for educational loans. This
information shall be provided free of charge to approved postsecondary
educational institutions (as defined by IC 21-7-13-6(a)). The
department shall establish fees that all other institutions must pay to the
department to obtain information under this subsection. However, these
fees may not exceed the department's administrative costs in providing
the information to the institution.
(e) The information described in subsection (a) relating to reports
submitted under IC 6-6-1.1-502 concerning the number of gallons of
gasoline sold by a distributor and IC 6-6-2.5 concerning the number of
gallons of special fuel sold by a supplier and the number of gallons of
special fuel exported by a licensed exporter or imported by a licensed
transporter may be released by the commissioner upon receipt of a
written request for the information.
(f) The information described in subsection (a) may be revealed
upon the receipt of a written request from the administrative head of a
state agency of Indiana when:
(1) the state agency shows an official need for the information;
and
(2) the administrative head of the state agency agrees that any
information released will be kept confidential and will be used
solely for official purposes.
(g) The information described in subsection (a) may be revealed
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


upon the receipt of a written request from the chief law enforcement
officer of a state or local law enforcement agency in Indiana when it is
agreed that the information is to be confidential and to be used solely
for official purposes.
(h) The name and address of retail merchants, including township,
as specified in IC 6-2.5-8-1(k) may be released solely for tax collection
purposes to township assessors and county assessors.
(i) The department shall notify the appropriate innkeeper's tax
board, bureau, or commission that a taxpayer is delinquent in remitting
innkeepers' taxes under IC 6-9.
(j) All information relating to the delinquency or evasion of the
vehicle excise tax may be disclosed to the bureau of motor vehicles in
Indiana and may be disclosed to another state, if the information is
disclosed for the purpose of the enforcement and collection of the taxes
imposed by IC 6-6-5.
(k) All information relating to the delinquency or evasion of
commercial vehicle excise taxes payable to the bureau of motor
vehicles in Indiana may be disclosed to the bureau and may be
disclosed to another state, if the information is disclosed for the
purpose of the enforcement and collection of the taxes imposed by
IC 6-6-5.5.
(l) All information relating to the delinquency or evasion of
commercial vehicle excise taxes payable under the International
Registration Plan may be disclosed to another state, if the information
is disclosed for the purpose of the enforcement and collection of the
taxes imposed by IC 6-6-5.5.
(m) All information relating to the delinquency or evasion of the
excise taxes imposed on recreational vehicles and truck campers that
are payable to the bureau of motor vehicles in Indiana may be disclosed
to the bureau and may be disclosed to another state if the information
is disclosed for the purpose of the enforcement and collection of the
taxes imposed by IC 6-6-5.1.
(n) This section does not apply to:
(1) the beer excise tax, including brand and packaged type (IC
7.1-4-2);
(2) the liquor excise tax (IC 7.1-4-3);
(3) the wine excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4);
(4) the hard cider excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4.5);
(5) the vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5);
(6) the commercial vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5.5); and
(7) the fees under IC 13-23.
(o) The name and business address of retail merchants within each
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


county that sell tobacco products may be released to the division of
mental health and addiction and the alcohol and tobacco commission
solely for the purpose of the list prepared under IC 6-2.5-6-14.2.
(p) The name and business address of a person licensed by the
department under IC 6-6 or IC 6-7, or issued a registered retail
merchant's certificate under IC 6-2.5, may be released for the purpose
of reporting the status of the person's license or certificate.
(q) The department may release information concerning total
incremental tax amounts under:
(1) IC 5-28-26;
(2) IC 36-7-13;
(3) IC 36-7-26;
(4) IC 36-7-27;
(5) IC 36-7-31;
(6) IC 36-7-31.3; or
(7) any other statute providing for the calculation of incremental
state taxes that will be distributed to or retained by a political
subdivision or other entity;
to the fiscal officer of the political subdivision or other entity that
established the district or area from which the incremental taxes were
received if that fiscal officer enters into an agreement with the
department specifying that the political subdivision or other entity will
use the information solely for official purposes.
(r) The department may release the information as required in
IC 6-8.1-3-7.1 concerning:
(1) an innkeeper's tax, a food and beverage tax, or an admissions
tax under IC 6-9;
(2) the supplemental auto rental excise tax under IC 6-6-9.7; and
(3) the covered taxes allocated to a professional sports
development area fund, sports and convention facilities operating
fund, or other fund under IC 36-7-31 and IC 36-7-31.3.
(s) Information concerning state gross retail tax exemption
certificates that relate to a person who is exempt from the state gross
retail tax under IC 6-2.5-4-5 may be disclosed to a power subsidiary (as
defined in IC 6-2.5-1-22.5) or a person selling the services or
commodities listed in IC 6-2.5-4-5 for the purpose of enforcing and
collecting the state gross retail and use taxes under IC 6-2.5.
(t) (s) The department may release a statement of tax withholding
or other tax information statement provided on behalf of a taxpayer to
the department to:
(1) the taxpayer on whose behalf the tax withholding or other tax
information statement was provided to the department;
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


(2) the taxpayer's spouse, if:
(A) the taxpayer is deceased or incapacitated; and
(B) the taxpayer's spouse is filing a joint income tax return
with the taxpayer; or
(3) an administrator, executor, trustee, or other fiduciary acting on
behalf of the taxpayer if the taxpayer is deceased.
(u) (t) Information related to a listed tax regarding a taxpayer may
be disclosed to an individual without a power of attorney under
IC 6-8.1-3-8(a)(2) if:
(1) the individual is authorized to file returns and remit payments
for one (1) or more listed taxes on behalf of the taxpayer through
the department's online tax system before September 8, 2020;
(2) the information relates to a listed tax described in subdivision
(1) for which the individual is authorized to file returns and remit
payments;
(3) the taxpayer has been notified by the department of the
individual's ability to access the taxpayer's information for the
listed taxes described in subdivision (1) and the taxpayer has not
objected to the individual's access;
(4) the individual's authorization or right to access the taxpayer's
information for a listed tax described in subdivision (1) has not
been withdrawn by the taxpayer; and
(5) disclosure of the information to the individual is not
prohibited by federal law.
Except as otherwise provided by this article, this subsection does not
authorize the disclosure of any correspondence from the department
that is mailed or otherwise delivered to the taxpayer relating to the
specified listed taxes for which the individual was given authorization
by the taxpayer. The department shall establish a date, which may be
earlier but not later than September 1, 2023, after which a taxpayer's
information concerning returns and remittances for a listed tax may not
be disclosed to an individual without a power of attorney under
IC 6-8.1-3-8(a)(2) by providing notice to the affected taxpayers and
previously authorized individuals, including notification published on
the department's website. After the earlier of the date established by the
department or September 1, 2023, the department may not disclose a
taxpayer's information concerning returns and remittances for a listed
tax to an individual unless the individual has a power of attorney under
IC 6-8.1-3-8(a)(2) or the disclosure is otherwise allowed under this
article.
(v) (u) The department may publish a list of persons, corporations,
or other entities that qualify or have qualified for an exemption for
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125


sales tax under IC 6-2.5-5-16, IC 6-2.5-5-25, or IC 6-2.5-5-26, or
otherwise provide information regarding a person's, corporation's, or
entity's exemption status under IC 6-2.5-5-16, IC 6-2.5-5-25, or
IC 6-2.5-5-26. For purposes of this subsection, information that may be
disclosed includes:
(1) any federal identification number or other identification
number for the entity assigned by the department;
(2) any expiration date of an exemption under IC 6-2.5-5-25;
(3) whether any sales tax exemption has expired or has been
revoked by the department; and
(4) any other information reasonably necessary for a recipient of
an exemption certificate to determine if an exemption certificate
is valid.
(w) (v) The department may share a taxpayer's name and other
personal identification information with a tax preparer or tax
preparation software provider in cases where the department suspects
that a fraudulent return has been filed on behalf of a taxpayer and the
department suspects that the system of a taxpayer's previous year tax
preparer or tax preparation software provider has been breached.
SECTION 20. IC 14-19-11-17, AS ADDED BY P.L.127-2022,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. The authority is exempt under IC 6-2.5-5-16
from the state gross retail tax for transactions involving tangible
personal property, public utility commodities, and public utility service.
2026 IN 1340—LS 6560/DI 125